Utah statutes.
72-1-208.   Cooperation with counties, cities, towns, the federal government, and all state departments -- Inspection of work done by a public transit district.

(1)  The department shall cooperate with the counties, cities, towns, and community development and renewal agencies in the construction, maintenance, and use of the highways and in all related matters, and may provide services to the counties, cities, towns, and community development and renewal agencies on terms mutually agreed upon.

(2)  The department, with the approval of the governor, shall cooperate with the federal government in all federal-aid projects and with all state departments in all matters in connection with the use of the highways.

(3)  The department:

(a)  shall inspect all work done by a public transit district under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act, relating to safety appliances and procedures; and

(b)  may make further additions or changes necessary for the purpose of safety to employees and the general public.



Amended by Chapter 279, 2010 General Session

